Hawaii statutes.
[§412:13-209] Filing of amendments to
articles of incorporation. A foreign bank that is licensed to maintain a
Hawaii state branch or Hawaii state agency, whenever its articles of
incorporation are amended, shall forthwith file in the office of the commissioner
a copy of the amendment duly authenticated by the proper officer of the country
of the foreign bank's organization, but the filing thereof may not of itself
enlarge or alter the purpose or purposes for which the foreign bank is
authorized to pursue in the transaction of its business in this State, nor
authorize the foreign bank to transact business in this State under any name
other than the name set forth in its license, nor extend the duration of its
corporate existence. If the amendment is in a foreign language, an English
translation of the amendment under the oath of the translator shall accompany
the amendment. [L 1996, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next